cs: Obchod a průmysl > Těžká stavební technika > Díly a příslušenství pro těžkou techniku: Kbelíky; Hutnicí stroje a válce; Drapáky; Hydraulická kladiva; Rychlospojky; Rozrývače; Palce
nb: Forretninger og industri > Tunge maskiner > Deler og tilbehør til tunge maskiner: Bøtter; Kompaktorer og valser; Griperedskaper og klør; Hydrauliske hammere; Hurtigkoblinger; Riveredskaper; Griperedskaper
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Radni strojevi > Dijelovi i dodatna oprema za radne strojeve: Kante; Kompaktori i valjci; Kuke i hvataljke; Hidraulični čekići; Brze spojnice; Riper; Žlice
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Mașini grele > Piese și accesorii pentru mașini grele: Găleți; Compactoare și role; Graifere și dispozitive cu gheare; Ciocane hidraulice; Cuple rapide; Scarificatoare; Instrumente de prindere
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 重機 > 重機部品・アクセサリー: バケツ; コンパクター・ローラー; グラップル・グラブ; 油圧ハンマー; クイックカプラ; リッパー; サム
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Cơ khí nặng > Linh kiện và phụ kiện máy móc hạng nặng: Gầu; Máy đầm và máy lu; Kẹp gắp và càng gắp; Búa thủy lực; Khớp nối nhanh; Lưỡi xới; Kẹp gắp
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Raskaskalusto > Raskaiden koneiden osat ja tarvikkeet: Kauhat; Maantiivistäjät ja jyrät; Kahmarit ja tarttumakourat; Iskuvasarat; Pikaliittimet; Jyrsimet; Kourat
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > เครื่องสำหรับอุตสาหกรรมหนัก > ชิ้นส่วนเครื่องจักรกลหนักและอุปกรณ์เสริม: ถัง; เครื่องบดอัดและลูกกลิ้ง; ตะขอและที่จับ; ค้อนไฮดรอลิก; ข้อต่อด่วน; ริปเปอร์; นิ้วหัวแม่มือ
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Sunkioji technika > Sunkiųjų mašinų dalys ir priedai: Kibirai; Tankintuvai ir volai; Griebtuvai ir sugriebėjai; Hidrauliniai plaktukai; Greito prijungimo jungtys; Plėštuvai; Ekskavatoriai
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Ciężki sprzęt > Części i akcesoria do maszyn ciężkich: Łyżki; Zagęszczarki i walce; Chwytaki i kleszcze; Młoty hydrauliczne; Szybkozłącza; Zrywaki; Kciuki
da: Erhverv og industri > Store maskiner > Dele og tilbehør til tunge maskiner: Spande; Komprimatorer og tromler; Grabskovle og gribere; Hydrauliske hamre; Hurtigkoblinger; Rivetand; Gribemekanisme
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Тежка техника > Части и аксесоари за тежки машини: Кофи; Компактори и валяци; Куки и екскаватори; Хидравлични чукове; Бързи съединители; Култиватори; Палци
en: Business & Industrial > Heavy Machinery > Heavy Machinery Parts & Accessories: Buckets; Compactors & Rollers; Grapples & Grabs; Hydraulic Hammers; Quick Couplers; Rippers; Thumbs
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Machinerie lourde > Pièces et accessoires pour machines lourdes: Seaux; Compacteurs et rouleaux; Grappins et pinces; Marteaux hydrauliques; Coupleurs rapides; Rippers; Outils de préhension
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Тяжелая техника > Запчасти и аксессуары для тяжелой техники: Ведра; Уплотнители и катки; Грейферы и захваты; Гидравлические молоты; Быстроразъемные соединения; Рыхлители; Башмаки
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 重型机械 > 重型机械零件/配件: 铲斗; 压实机和压路机; 抓斗和抓取器; 液压锤; 快速接合器; 松土器; 拇指夹
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 중공업 > 중장비 부품 및 액세서리: 양동이; 압축기 및 롤러; 그래플 & 그랩; 유압 해머; 퀵 커플러; 리퍼스; 집게
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Nehézgépek > Nehézgépalkatrészek és -kiegészítők: Vödrök; Tömörítők és hengerek; Markolók és fogókarok; Hidraulikus kalapácsok; Gyorscsatlakozók; Ripperek; Markolóhüvelykujj
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Zwaar materieel > Onderdelen en accessoires voor zware machines: Emmers; Verdichters en walsen; Grijpers; Hydraulische hamers; Snelkoppelingen; Rippers; Duimen
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Ağır İş Makineleri > Ağır İş Makinesi Parçaları ve Aksesuarları: Kovalar; Sıkıştırıcılar ve Silindirler; Yakalama ve Tutma; Hidrolik Çekiçler; Hızlı Bağlantı Elemanları; Kazıyıcılar; Başparmak Kelepçesi
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Βαρέα μηχανήματα > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ βαρέων μηχανημάτων: Κάδοι; Συσκευές συμπίεσης & Οδοστρωτήρες; Αρπάγες με δαγκάνες & Αρπάγες με κουτάλες; Υδραυλικά σφυριά; Ταχυσύνδεσμοι; Σχιστήρες; Υδραυλικοί αντίχειρες
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Ťažké strojárenstvo > Diely a príslušenstvo pre ťažké stroje: Vedrá; Zhutňovače a valce; Drapáky a uchopovače; Hydraulické kladivá; Rýchloupínače; Rozrývače; Palce
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Težka mehanizacija > Deli in dodatki za težko mehanizacijo: Vedra; Zgoščevalniki in valjarji; Klešče in grabilci; Hidravlična kladiva; Hitre spojke; Rahljalniki; Prijemala
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Maquinaria pesada > Peças e acessórios de maquinaria pesada: Baldes; Compactadores e rolos; Garras e pinças; Martelos hidráulicos; Engates rápidos; Rippers; Baldes de escavação
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 重型機具 > 重型機械零件與配件: 水桶; 壓實機與壓路機; 抓鬥夾具; 油壓錘; 快速接頭; 松土器; 拇指夾
it: Commercio e industria > Macchinari pesanti > Parti e accessori per macchinari pesanti: Secchi; Compattatori e rulli; Pinze e benne; Martelli idraulici; Attacchi rapidi; Ripper; Pollici
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Maquinaria pesada > Peças e acessórios para maquinaria pesada: Baldes; Compactadores e rolos; Garras; Martelos hidráulicos; Engates rápidos; Escarificadores; Polegar hidráulico
es: Economía e industria > Maquinaria pesada > Piezas y accesorios para maquinaria pesada: Cubos o baldes; Compactadores y rodillos; Pinzas y agarres; Martillos hidráulicos; Acopladores rápidos; Destripadores; Pulgares
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Schwermaschinen > Teile und Zubehör für Großmaschinen: Eimer; Verdichter und Walzen; Greifer; Hydraulikhämmer; Schnellwechsler; Ripper; Daumen
sv: Företag och industri > Anläggningsmaskiner > Delar och tillbehör till anläggningsmaskiner: Hinkar; Komprimatorer och vältar; Gripar och gripare; Hydrauliska hammare; Snabbkopplingar; Jorduppluckrare; Tummarna